texlive/tex/generic/ruhyphen/ruhyphmg.tex
% Russian hyphenation patterns
% (c) 1998 Mikhail Grinchuk <grinchuk@lsil.com>; public domain
% version date: May 30, 1998
\patterns{
а1
е1
и1
о1
у1
ы1
э1
ю1
я1
2б
2в
2г
2д
2ж
2з
2к
2л
2м
2н
2п
2р
2с
2т
2ф
2х
2ц
2ч
2ш
2щ
8й3
8ь3
8ъ3
ъе8
ъю8
ъя8
3ба
3бе
3би
3бо
3бу
3бы
3бю
3бя
3ва
3ве
3ви
3во
3ву
3вы
3вю
3вя
3га
3ге
3ги
3го
3гу
3да
3де
3ди
3до
3ду
3ды
3дю
3дя
3жа
3же
3жи
3жо
3жу
3за
3зе
3зи
3зо
3зу
3зы
3зю
3зя
3ка
3ке
3ки
3ко
3ку
3ла
3ле
3ли
3ло
3лу
3лы
3лю
3ля
3ма
3ме
3ми
3мо
3му
3мы
3мю
3мя
3на
3не
3ни
3но
3ну
3ны
3ню
3ня
3па
3пе
3пи
3по
3пу
3пы
3пю
3пя
3ра
3ре
3ри
3ро
3ру
3ры
3рю
3ря
3са
3се
3си
3со
3су
3сы
3сю
3ся
3та
3те
3ти
3то
3ту
3ты
3тю
3тя
3фа
3фе
3фи
3фо
3фу
3фы
3фя
3ха
3хе
3хи
3хо
3ху
3ца
3це
3ци
3цо
3цу
3цы
3ча
3че
3чи
3чо
3чу
3ша
3ше
3ши
3шо
3шу
3шю
3ща
3ще
3щи
3що
3щу
3с4ка
3с4ке
3с4ки
3с4ко
3с4ку
3с4та
3с4те
3с4ти
3с4то
3с4ту
3г4ла
3г4ра
3г4ре
3г4ри
3г4ро
3г4ру
3г4ры
3г4рю
3г4ря
3к4ра
3к4ре
3к4ри
3к4ро
3к4ру
3к4ры
3к4рю
3к4ря
4бь8е
4бь8и
4бь8ю
4бь8я
4вь8е
4вь8и
4вь8ю
4вь8я
4дь8е
4дь8и
4дь8ю
4дь8я
4жь8е
4жь8и
4жь8ю
4жь8я
4зь8е
4зь8и
4зь8ю
4зь8я
4ль8е
4ль8и
4ль8ю
4ль8я
4мь8е
4мь8и
4мь8ю
4мь8я
4нь8е
4нь8и
4нь8ю
4нь8я
4пь8е
4пь8и
4пь8ю
4пь8я
4рь8е
4рь8и
4рь8ю
4рь8я
4сь8е
4сь8и
4сь8ю
4сь8я
4ть8е
4ть8и
4ть8ю
4ть8я
4чь8е
4чь8и
4чь8ю
4чь8я
4шь8е
4шь8и
4шь8ю
4шь8я
4щь8е
4щь8и
4щь8ю
4щь8я
4с4ть8е
4с4ть8и
4с4ть8ю
4с4ть8я
.бь8
.вб8
.вг8
.вд8
.вз8
.вк8
.вп8
.вс8
.вт8
.вх8
.въ8
.вь8
.дь8
.зд8
.ль8
.мг8
.мз8
.мс8
.нь8
.пс8
.пь8
.рь8
.сб8
.сг8
.сд8
.ск8
.см8
.сп8
.ст8
.сх8
.съ8
.сь8
.тк8
.ть8
.фь8
.хь8
.чь8
.шк8
.шп8
.шт8
.шь8
8с8тв.
8ск.
8тр.
8дь.
8зь.
8ль.
8с8тр.
8гр.
8пр.
8прь.
8трь.
3с4т3р
.ра8с5ко
3б8люд
3б8ран
3в4лек
3в4леч
3в8рем
3д4виг
3д4виж
3д4вин
3д8робн
3з8везд
3з6на
4з7на.
4з7ная
3к8люч
3к8ниг
3к8ниж
3к8ня
3к8х8м
3п8ласт
3п8лоск
3п8р
3с4л
3с8ред
3с8т8рое
3с8т8рои
3с8т8рой
3с8тав
3с8тан
3ств
3т8вер3ж3д
3т8р
3х8ран
3ш8ла
3ш8ли
3ш8ло
3ш8т
8бц
8з3в8р
8к8р8т8
8м3п8л
8о3лог
8сль.
8сл.
а8сим3п8
взг8
взд8
взъ8
вск8
всп8
вст8
всх8
ге8о3г
ге8о3м
до3ста
еу8ч
з3г8н
зб8
и2она
и2они
и8з8у8ч
иу8ч
мыс5л
на3з8ва
на3у8к
на3у8ч
о8б8у8ч
оу8ч
по3в8то
ра8з8у8ч
рас3с
со3в8па
чис5л
ыу8ч
.ап3п8
.ас8т8р8о
.ат3т8
.бе8с5к
.ис3с8
.на3п8
.на4и3
.на5и4в3н
.под3м8
.под3с8
.под3т8
.при3б8л8
.рас3п8
.рас3с8
.со3б8ра
.со3с8т
в3ф4р
д3д4в
з3д4в
}
\hyphenation{
ес-ли
все-гда
ино-гда
ко-гда
то-гда
неко-гда
ни-ко-гда
кста-ти
некста-ти
негде
ни-где
некто
ни-кто
нечто
ни-что
по-чти
по-сле
ни-сколь-ко
не-льзя
немно-го
на-мно-го
по-это-му
}
